Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-323
Life insurance policy, disability insurance policy, or long-term care insurance policy; living organ donor; treatment.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) Insurance coverage means coverage under a disability insurance, life insurance, or long-term care insurance policy; and

(b) Living organ donor means an individual who:

(i) Has donated all or part of an organ; and

(ii) Is not deceased.

(2) It shall be unlawful for an insurer to deny insurance coverage, cancel insurance coverage, or determine the price or premium for, refuse to issue, or otherwise vary any term or condition of a life insurance policy, disability insurance policy, or long-term care insurance policy solely on the basis of an individual's status as a living organ donor and without any unique and material actuarial risks in accordance with sound actuarial principles and actual and reasonably anticipated and expected experiences of such individual on the basis of the individual's status as a living organ donor.

Laws 2022, LB863, § 18.